Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-228
State-owned land occupied by school, church, or cemetery; sale; terms.

Sales of land made for the special purpose mentioned in section 72-227 shall be for cash, and if there be buildings on such land belonging to the state, such buildings are to be appraised and sold separately.

Laws 1885, c. 84, § 4, p. 334;

R.S.1913, § 5857;

C.S.1922, § 5193;

C.S.1929, § 72-213;

R.S.1943, § 72-228.